Idaho, session 2026, H0930.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6604. ACCOUNTS DUTIES OF POLITICAL TREASURER. (1) The political
treasurer for each candidate or political committee shall keep detailed
accounts, current within not more than seven (7) days after the date of
receiving the contribution or making an expenditure, of all contributions
received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the candidate or polit-
ical committee that are required to be set forth in a statement filed under
this chapter serve as the official point of contact for the secretary of
state for any candidate's campaign and for any political committee.
(2) The political treasurer for each candidate or political committee
required to file reports pursuant to section 67-6607, Idaho Code, shall
maintain at least one (1) checking account with a financial institution. All
moneys received by a candidate's campaign or a political committee shall
be deposited in such account. The political treasurer shall keep detailed
accounts of all contributions received and all expenditures made by or on be-
half of the candidate or political committee. The political treasurer shall
keep the accounts current within seven (7) days after the date of receiving a
contribution or making an expenditure. Candidate campaign funds and politi-
cal committee funds shall be segregated from, and may not be commingled with,
any other account. Candidate campaign funds and political committee funds
may be invested only in certificates of deposit, money market accounts, or
other cash-equivalent accounts held in the name of the campaign or political
committee; such funds shall not be invested in stocks or other equity securi-
ties. A candidate who loans personal funds to such candidate's campaign in
an amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall transfer such funds
to the candidate campaign account.
(2) (3) The political treasurer shall be responsible for making and
filing all reports that are required of a candidate under this chapter.
Accounts kept by the political treasurer for a candidate or political com-
mittee may be inspected before the election to which the accounts refer by
the secretary of state, or county clerk for local government offices or mea-
sures, or his agent or employee, who is making an investigation pursuant to
section 67-6615, Idaho Code.
(3) (4) Accounts kept by a political treasurer shall be preserved by him
for at least one (1) year after the date of the election to which the accounts


refer or at least one (1) year after the date the last statement is filed un-
der section 67-6607, Idaho Code, whichever is later.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.